Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-613
Lottery equipment, defined.

Lottery equipment shall mean all proprietary devices, machines, and parts used in the manufacture or maintenance of equipment which is used in and is an integral part of the conduct of any lottery activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 54.